grammars/class.verbs.weighted.lexc
LEXICON IrregularVerbsIntr
@R.TENSE.NP@bengmid[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@bengmiddan^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                ! forget
@R.TENSE.P@bengmid[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@bengmiddanj^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
@R.TENSE.P@bengmid[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@bengmiddangeni^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
bengmid[Imp]:bengmiddangimen^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
bengmid[Irr]:bengmiddangemeninj^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;

@R.TENSE.NP@bore[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@bore^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                          ! flow (water)
@R.TENSE.P@bore[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@bowam^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
@R.TENSE.P@bore[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@borey^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
bore[Imp]:boray^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
bore[Irr]:borayinj^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;

@R.TENSE.NP@dungre[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@dungre^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                     ! movement of the sun
@R.TENSE.P@dungre[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@dungwam^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
@R.TENSE.P@dungre[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@dungrey^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
dungre[Imp]:dungray^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
dungre[Irr]:dungrayinj^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;

@R.TENSE.NP@kakre[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@kakre^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                       ! travel at night
@R.TENSE.P@kakre[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@kakwam^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
@R.TENSE.P@kakre[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@kakrey^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
kakre[Imp]:kakray^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
kakre[Irr]:kakrayinj^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;

@R.TENSE.NP@kurlbare[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@kurlbare^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                  ! travel at night
@R.TENSE.P@kurlbare[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@kurlbawam^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
@R.TENSE.P@kurlbare[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@kurlbarey^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
kurlbare[Imp]:kurlbaray^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
kurlbare[Irr]:kurlbarayinj^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;

@R.TENSE.NP@wohre[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@wohre^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                        ! wander, walk around
@R.TENSE.P@wohre[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@wohwam^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
@R.TENSE.P@wohre[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@wohrey^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
wohre[Imp]:wohray^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
wohre[Irr]:wohrayinj^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;

LEXICON IrregularVerbsTrns
@R.TENSE.NP@mulewan[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@mulewan^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                    ! inform
@R.TENSE.P@mulewan[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@mulewam^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
@R.TENSE.P@mulewan[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@mulewani^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;

LEXICON RRConj
@R.TENSE.NP@[NonPst]:@R.TENSE.NP@n^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstPerf]:@R.TENSE.P@~inj^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@[PstImperf]:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
[Imp]:~emen^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
[Irr]:~imeninj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ;

LEXICON IntransitiveVerbs
0:0 IrregularVerbsIntr ;                                ! there are a couple irregular intransitive^ Verbs to treat explicitly 
LEXICON TransitiveVerbs
0:0 IrregularVerbsTrns ;                ! there are a couple irregular transitive verbs to treat explicitly 
